Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2012
76-3107
Private transfer fee obligation,
defined.

Private
transfer fee obligation means an obligation arising under a declaration or
covenant recorded against the title to real property, or under any other contractual
agreement or promise, whether or not recorded, that requires or purports to
require the payment of a private transfer fee upon a subsequent transfer of
an interest in the real property.

Laws 2011, LB26, § 7.